District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

24-201.01

Place of imprisonment; cumulative sentences; jurisdiction of prosecutions.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 623, Pub. L. 88-241, § 21

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-401.
1973 Ed., § 24-401.